vi: Hướng quay của cánh quạt: Kép / Xoay ngược chiều; Tay trái (LH); Tay phải (RH); Khác
el: Περιστροφή της έλικας: Διπλή / Αντίθετης περιστροφής; Αριστερόστροφη (LH); Δεξιόστροφη (RH); Άλλο
hu: Propeller forgása: Kettős / ellentétes forgású; Balos (LH); Jobbos (RH); Egyéb
sl-SI: Smer vrtenja propelerja: Dvojno/nasprotno vrtenje; Levo (LH); Desno (RH); Drugo
es: Rotación de la hélice: Doble/contrarrotante; A la izquierda (LH); Derecha (RH); Otro
ko: 프로펠러 회전: 듀얼/역회전; 좌회전(LH); 우회전(RH); 기타
da: Propelrotation: Dobbelt/modroterende; Venstregående (LH); Højregående (RH); Anden
th: การหมุนของใบพัด: หมุนคู่ / หมุนสวนทาง; หมุนซ้าย (LH); หมุนขวา (RH); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Rotacija propelera: Dvostruka / proturotirajuća; Lijeva (LH); Desna (RH); Ostalo
ru: Направление вращения винта: Двойного / встречного вращения; Левого вращения (LH); Правого вращения (RH); Другое
pt-PT: Rotação da hélice: Dupla/contrarrotativa; Esquerda (LH); Direita (RH); Outra
fi: Potkurin pyörimissuunta: Kaksois-/vastakkainpyörivä; Vasen kätisyys (LH); Oikea kätisyys (RH); Muu
lt-LT: Propelerio sukimosi kryptis: Dvigubas / priešpriešinis sukimasis; Kairinis (LH); Dešininis (RH); Kita
fr: Rotation de l’hélice: Double / contrarotative; Rotation gauche (LH); Rotation droite (RH); Autre
zh-CN: 螺旋桨旋转方向: 双向/反向旋转; 左旋 (LH); 右旋 (RH); 其他
pl: Kierunek obrotu śruby napędowej: Podwójne / przeciwbieżne; Lewoskrętne (LH); Prawoskrętne (RH); Inny
ro-RO: Rotația elicei: Rotație dublă / contrarotativă; Spre stânga (LH); Spre dreapta (RH); Altele
nb: Propellrotasjon: Dobbel / motroterende; Venstrehendt (LH); Høyrehendt (RH); Annet
it: Rotazione dell'elica: Doppia / controrotante; Sinistrorsa (LH); Destrorsa (RH); Altro
sv: Propellerrotation: Dubbel / motroterande; Vänstergående (LH); Högergående (RH); Övrigt
cs: Rotace vrtule: Dvojitá / protiběžná rotace; Levotočivá (LH); Pravotočivá (RH); Ostatní
sk-SK: Otáčanie vrtule: Duálna/protibežná rotácia; Ľavotočivá (LH); Pravotočivá (RH); Iná
tr: Pervane dönüş yönü: Çift / ters yöne dönen; Sol yönlü (LH); Sağ yönlü (RH); Diğer
en: Propeller rotation: Dual / Counter-rotating; Left-hand (LH); Right-hand (RH); Other
ja: プロペラの回転: デュアル / 二重反転; 左巻き (LH); 右巻き (RH); その他
pt-BR: Hélice rotação: Dupla/contrarrotativa; Rotação para a esquerda (LH); Rotação para a direita (RH); Outra
de: Drehrichtung des Propellers: Doppel / Gegenläufig; Linksdrehend (LH); Rechtsdrehend (RH); Sonstige
bg-BG: Въртене на перката: Двойно / обратно въртене; Ляво (LH); Дясно (RH); Друго
nl: Propeller draairichting: Dubbel / tegengesteld draaiend; Linksdraaiend (LH); Rechtsdraaiend (RH); Anders
zh-TW: 螺旋槳旋轉方向: 雙向/反向旋轉; 左旋 (LH); 右旋 (RH); 其他